Hawaii statutes.
§279A-7 Statewide transportation
council; responsibilities. In addition to its responsibility for
coordinating the development of a statewide transportation plan, the council
shall be responsible for the following functions:

(1) The council shall be responsible for making
recommendations on projects for submission to the legislature which involve
solely and exclusively either state highways, harbors and water-borne transit,
and airports and air transportation; solely and exclusively state funds; or solely
state lands. All other projects for submission to the legislature, including
intra- county mass transit projects, shall be the responsibility of the
counties.

(2) In respect to transportation projects for which
the counties are responsible for planning and approval prior to submission to
the legislature, the council shall review such projects and prepare comments
for the legislature regarding:

(A) The degree to which an intra-island
transportation project interfaces efficiently with existing proposed
inter-island transportation system; and

(B) The relationship between the specific
projects' possible requirements for state financial assistance and projections
as to the State's total potential financial commitments required for
development of a statewide transportation system.

(3) Counties which do not have metropolitan planning
organizations may request from the council, and the council shall provide,
technical assistance to the counties in the preparation of their respective
county transportation plans as components of the statewide transportation
planning process. The amounts of technical assistance to be provided hereunder
are within the discretion of the chairperson who shall consider in making the
chairperson's determinations the magnitude of the problems which exist in the
requesting counties, the availability of local resources, the degree to which
they are cooperatively participating in the statewide planning process and the
adequacy of the council's budget considering the financial requirements of
overall council operations. [L 1975, c 179, §7; gen ch 1985; am L 1991, c 35,
§1; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next